Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.070

Licensing—Persons to whom chapter inapplicable.

This chapter shall not apply to persons licensed under other laws of this state who are performing services within their authorized scope of practice and shall not be construed to require a license for students enrolled in a school or an apprentice engaged in a state-approved apprenticeship program as defined in RCW 18.16.020.

[ 2003 c 400 s 3; 1984 c 208 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 400: See note following RCW 18.16.280.